North Carolina, session 2025, SB1026.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

LARGE-LOAD ELECTRICITY CUSTOMERS
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 62-3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 62-3. Definitions.
As used in this Chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:
…
(16a) "Large-load customer" means a nonresidential customer for retail electric
service who has an actual or projected peak demand equal to or greater than
50 megawatts (MW). For a nonresidential customer who operates facilities
located at multiple sites, the aggregate demand of the nonresidential customer
across multiple sites shall be used for purposes of determining the
applicability of any threshold, requirement, or limitation in this Chapter.
(16a)(16b) "Local exchange company" means a person holding, on January 1, 1995,
a certificate to provide local exchange services or exchange access services.
…
(19a) "Panel" means a panel of three commissioners, a division of the Utilities
Commission authorized for the purpose of carrying out certain functions of
the Commission.
…
(30) "Panel" means a panel of three commissioners, a division of the Utilities
Commission authorized for the purpose of carrying out certain functions of
the Commission.
(31) Very large-load customer. – A large-load customer who has an actual or
projected peak demand equal or greater than 100 megawatts (MW)."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 62-133.5(h)(1)a. reads as rewritten:
"a. Local exchange company. – The same meaning as provided in
G.S. 62-3(16a).G.S. 62-3(16b)."
SECTION 2.(a) Chapter 62 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 6C.
"Large-Load Electricity Customers.
*S1026-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 62-127.1. Electric service tariffs for large-load customers.
(a) Application. – Each electric public utility shall file for approval by the Commission
tariffs for the provision of electric service to large-load customers. Subject to the limitations set
forth in this section, the Commission may approve a tiered tariff schedule that includes different
rates, terms, and conditions for different classes of large-load customers based on load
requirements or other factors related to the cost of service.
(b) General Terms and Conditions. – The Commission shall require an electric public
utility to incorporate the following terms and conditions in any tariff applicable to large-load
customers:
(1) A minimum contract term that obligates a large-load customer to receive
service for a term of no less than twenty years.
(2) A minimum billing demand requirement that obligates a large load customer
to take or pay for a certain percentage of the customer's maximum contracted
demand following commencement of service.
(3) A contribution in aid of construction mechanism that requires large-load
customers, prior to receiving initial service, to pay the electric public utility
the entire cost of any transmission, distribution, or interconnection
improvements attributable to serving that customer.
(4) An authorization on behalf of the large-load customer granting the electric
public utility sufficient access to review any relevant commercial agreement
or other confidential business information for the purpose of verifying the
feasibility of the customer's projected load requirement prior to making the
infrastructure improvements necessary to serve the customer.
(5) A reasonable credit or financial assurance requirement sufficient to protect
other ratepayers against any material increase in rates that could occur as a
result of a large-load customer either ceasing operations or taking less than
the contracted demand for electric service.
(6) A load ramp period, not to exceed four years, during which time the large-load
customer increases its electricity usage in accordance with a defined schedule
until authorized to receive its maximum contracted demand.
(7) A requirement that a large-load customer give the electric public utility
advanced notice prior to any anticipated reduction in its demand for electric
service.
(8) An exit fee or similar mechanism that allows an electric public utility to
recover from a large-load customer any forgone revenue as a result of the
large-load customer's (i) early termination of the electric service agreement,
(ii) failure to maintain contracted electric load, or (iii) abandonment or
downsizing of facilities receiving electric service.
(9) Any other provision that the Commission determines to be reasonable and in
the public interest.
(c) Specific Eligibility Conditions for Very Large-Load Customers. – The Commission
shall require that an electric public utility limit which very large-load customers can receive
electric service under a tariff filed in accordance with this section to those very large-load
customers who either (i) procure dedicated or incremental energy resources under the program
established in G.S. 62-127.2, or (ii) participate in a Commission-approved mechanism to mitigate
system cost impacts.
(d) Commission Approval. – The Commission shall approve a proposed electric service
tariff for large-load customers only upon finding that the tariff is just and reasonable, and
sufficiently designed to ensure all of the following:
(1) That the proposed rates are based on the cost causation principle, as defined
in G.S. 62-133.16, and that large-load customers will be responsible for the
Page 2 Senate Bill 1026-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
entire cost of any capital investments or incremental operational expenses
necessary for the electric public utility to serve large-load customers,
including any transmission, distribution, or interconnection costs reasonably
attributable to serving large-load customers.
(2) That the proposed rates will not result in the electric public utility's other retail
customers who are classified as residential or small commercial customers
having to cross-subsidize large-load customers.
(3) That the electric public utility's other retail customers who are classified as
residential or small commercial customers will be held harmless, and neither
advantaged nor disadvantaged, from large-load customers either commencing
service or discontinuing service under the proposed tariff.
(4) That the proposed tariff incorporates to the satisfaction of the Commission all
terms and conditions required under subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
(5) That the proposed tariff complies with any other rule or order adopted by the
Commission pursuant to this Article.
"§ 62-127.2. Dedicated or incremental energy supply for large-load customers.
(a) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the terms "clean energy facility" and "clean
energy resource" have the same meaning as provided in G.S. 62-133.8.
(b) Application. – Each electric public utility shall file with the Commission an
application requesting approval of a program to allow large-load customers to select clean energy
facilities from which the electric public utility will procure energy and capacity on behalf of the
large-load customer. Each application shall provide standard contract terms and conditions for
participating large-load customers and for the suppliers of clean energy resources from which the
electric public utility procures energy and capacity on behalf of the participating customer. The
standard terms and conditions available to suppliers of clean energy resources shall provide a
range of terms from which the participating customer may elect. Large-load customers shall be
allowed to negotiate with suppliers of clean energy resources regarding price terms.
(c) Limitations. – Each contracted amount of capacity shall be limited to no more than
one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the maximum annual peak demand of the large-load
customer's facilities. The electric public utility shall establish such requirements consistent with
G.S. 62-127.1(b) to protect other ratepayers against any material increase in rates that could occur
as a result of the large-load customer either ceasing operations or breaching any contractual
obligations made in accordance with the program.
(d) Cost Recovery; Bill Credits. – In addition to the large-load customer's normal retail
bill, the total cost of any clean energy resources and capacity procured by the electric public
utility for the benefit of the large-load customer shall be paid by that customer. The electric public
utility shall pay the owner of the clean energy facility which provided the electricity. The
participating large-load customer shall receive a bill credit for the energy in an amount
determined by the Commission, not to exceed the utility's avoided cost. The Commission shall
ensure that all other ratepayers are held neutral, neither advantaged nor disadvantaged, from the
impact of the clean energy resources procured on behalf of the large-load customer.
"§ 62-127.3. Rules.
Pursuant to G.S. 62-31, the Commission shall adopt rules to implement the requirements of
this Article. These rules shall include specific procedures and requirements for very large-load
customers to demonstrate eligibility, in accordance with G.S. 62-127.1(c), to receive service
under an electric service tariff for large-load customers by mitigating system cost impacts."
SECTION 2.(b) The tariff application required to be filed with the Utilities
Commission pursuant to G.S. 62-127.1, as enacted by subsection (a) of this section, shall be filed
by the electric public utility no later than 180 days after the effective date of this section. Effective
January 1, 2028, an electric public utility shall not provide electric service to a large-load
Senate Bill 1026-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
customer except under the terms of a tariff approved by the Utilities Commission in accordance
with G.S. 62-127.1.
SECTION 2.(c) The application required to be filed with the Utilities Commission
pursuant to G.S. 62-127.2, as enacted by subsection (a) of this section, shall be filed by the
electric public utility no later than 180 days after the effective date of this section.
SECTION 2.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law.

STANDBY ELECTRICITY SERVICE
SECTION 3. The Utilities Commission shall evaluate and modify as necessary
existing standby service charges, including any eligibility limits based on maximum electricity
demands, for the purpose of enabling large-load customers to self-develop dedicated or
incremental generation resources in order to meet their electricity needs through self-supply.

SURCHARGE ON LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMERS TO FUND GRID MODERNIZATION
PROJECTS
SECTION 4. Article 7 of Chapter 62 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 62-157.1. Grid modernization projects fund; large-load customer surcharge.
(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds that substantial investments in electric
generation and transmission infrastructure will be required to meet the growing demand for
electric power in the North Carolina, which is primarily attributable to the proliferation of new
data centers and other large-load facilities locating in the State. These investments have been
made at significant cost to the electric public utilities, which ultimately recover these costs from
other utility customers in the form of higher retail rates. The General Assembly finds it to be in
the public interest to establish a surcharge on the purchases of electric power by large-load
customers to be used to fund grid modernization projects to reduce system-wide costs and to
mitigate the disproportionate impact that higher electric rates have on other retail customers in
the State.
(b) Grid Modernization Projects Fund.– In order to mitigate the impact of higher electric
rates faced by residents of the State, the Commission shall, after a hearing, order an electric public
utility to create a special fund to be used by that utility to implement grid modernization projects
for the purpose of reducing the system-wide costs incurred as a result of serving the growing
electricity demands of large-load customers. The fund shall be supervised and administered by
the Commission. Any applicable taxes shall be paid out of the fund.
(c) Eligible Projects. – Pursuant to an order of the Commission, the electric public utility
may apply funds to grid modernization projects that are designed to reduce low-income energy
burdens and to encourage peak load reduction, energy efficiency, demand response measures,
and distributed energy resources, including virtual power plants. The Commission shall ensure
that all projects to which the grid modernization projects funds are applied are consistent with
the intent of this section and G.S. 62-110.9.
(d) Authority to Require Surcharge. – The Commission shall require electric public
utilities to assess a surcharge on the purchases of electric power by large-load customers to fund
grid modernization projects. Upon petition by an electric public utility, and after giving notice
and an opportunity for other interested parties to be heard, the Commission shall set a monthly
surcharge on electricity consumption by large-load customers, assessed on a kilowatt-hour (kWh)
basis, at a rate that generates sufficient revenue to offset the incremental costs attributable to
serving large-load customers.
(e) Adjustment Proceedings. – The Commission may, on its own motion or upon petition
of an electric public utility or interested party, conduct a hearing to review an electric public
utility's implementation of grid modernization projects and the surcharge on electricity purchased
by large-load customers. The Commission may, after giving notice and an opportunity for other
Page 4 Senate Bill 1026-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
parties to be heard, approve a revision to the surcharge or make other appropriate adjustments to
the administration of the grid modernization projects fund.
(f) Annual Report. – An electric public utility shall submit a report each year to the
Utilities Commission and the State Energy Office that includes aggregated data on the amount
of funds collected by the surcharge on purchases of electric power by large-load customers, the
amount of funds expended on grid modernization projects, the number and types of grid
modernization projects implemented, and the estimated average reduction in retail electric utility
bills as a result of the grid modernization projects carried out in accordance with this section."

GRID MODERNIZATION PLANNING
SECTION 5.(a) Article 5A of Chapter 62 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 62-108. Grid modernization plan.
(a) The Commission shall develop, publicize, and keep current a grid modernization plan
to maintain and improve the adequacy, reliability, and resiliency of the electric grid for the benefit
of the people of North Carolina. In developing the grid modernization plan, the Commission shall
assess the capability of the grid system to withstand and recover from climate-induced natural
disasters and other significant multi-hazard threats with minimal resulting damage or loss of
operability. The Commission shall propose measures informed by this assessment that are
designed to improve the efficiency of the grid system, reduce energy losses, enable flexible load
management, and lower long-term system costs. The Commission shall consider the grid
modernization plan in acting upon any petition by an applicant for a certificate to construct a new
transmission line.
(b) In the course of developing the grid modernization plan, the Commission shall consult
with electric power suppliers, the Public Staff, and other interested parties. The Commission shall
also provide opportunities for public hearings on the proposals set forth in the grid modernization
plan.
(c) No later than April 1 of each year, the Commission shall submit a report on the
activities taken by the Commission to develop, and by electric public utilities to implement, the
grid modernization plan to the Governor, the Environmental Review Commission, the Joint
Legislative Commission on Energy Policy, and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources. The report shall include a summary of public
comments received by the Commission."
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 62-102(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 62-102. Application for certificate.
(a) An applicant for the certificate described in G.S. 62-101 shall file an application with
the Commission containing the following information:
(1) The reasons the transmission line is needed;
(2) A description of the proposed location of the transmission line;
(3) A description of the proposed transmission line;
(4) An environmental report setting forth:
a. The environmental impact of the proposed action;
b. Any proposed mitigating measures that may minimize the
environmental impact; and
c. Alternatives to the proposed action.
(4a) A statement on the project's consistency with the Commission's grid
modernization plan, as provided in G.S. 62-108.
(5) A list of all necessary approvals that the applicant must obtain before it may
begin to construct the transmission line; and
(6) Any other information the Commission requires."
SECTION 5.(c) G.S. 62-105 reads as rewritten:
Senate Bill 1026-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 62-105. Burden of proof; decision.
(a) The burden of proof is on the applicant in all cases under this Article, except that any
party proposing an alternative location for the proposed transmission line shall have the burden
of proof in sustaining its position. The Commission may consider any factors that it finds are
relevant and material to its decision. The Commission shall grant a certificate for the
construction, operation, and maintenance of the proposed transmission line if it finds:upon
finding each of the following:
(1) That the proposed transmission line is necessary to satisfy the reasonable
needs of the public for an adequate and reliable supply of electric
energy;energy.
(2) That, when compared with reasonable alternative courses of action,
construction of the transmission line in the proposed location is reasonable,
preferred, and in the public interest;interest.
(3) That the costs associated with the proposed transmission line are
reasonable;reasonable.
(4) That the impact the proposed transmission line will have on the environment
is justified considering the state of available technology, the nature and
economics of the various alternatives, and other material considerations;
andconsiderations.
(4a) That the proposed transmission line is consistent with the grid modernization
plan developed by the Commission under G.S. 62-108.
(5) That the environmental compatibility, public convenience, and necessity
require the transmission line.
(b) If the Commission determines that the location of the proposed transmission line
should be modified, it may condition its certificate upon modifications it finds necessary to make
the findings and determinations set forth in subsection (a) of this section."

LOAD FORECASTING FOR NEW ELECTRIC GENERATING FACILITIES
SECTION 6. G.S. 62-110.1 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d1) In acting on a petition by an electric public utility for the construction of an electric
generating facility to serve future growth in electricity demand attributable to new large-load
customers, the Commission shall require the applicant to demonstrate the reasonableness of such
future growth projections by distinguishing between confirmed and speculative sources of new
electricity demand, and by filing with the Commission any agreements between the utility and
its large-load customers obligating the customers to receive electric services. The Commission
shall not grant a certificate for the construction of an electric generating facility to meet demand
attributable to new large-load customers unless the applicant demonstrates that its future demand
growth projections are reasonable and supported by competent evidence."

LARGE-LOAD CUSTOMER ENERGY AND WATER REPORTING
SECTION 7.(a) Article 17 of Chapter 62 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 62-353. Large-load customers; annual reporting on energy and water consumption.
(a) Annual Report. – Each large-load customer shall file an annual report to the
Commission and the Department of Environmental Quality that provides the following
information about the operation of its facilities during the prior year:
(1) The total amount of electricity consumed.
(2) The maximum annual peak demand, as defined in G.S. 62-126.3.
(3) The load factor, as calculated based on the total electricity consumed relative
to the maximum annual peak demand.
(4) The total amount of water consumed.
Page 6 Senate Bill 1026-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) The source of the customer's water supplies.
(6) A description of the cooling methods used in the customer's facilities,
including available data indicating the efficiency of the cooling methods used.
(7) Any additional information requested by the Commission or the Department
of Environmental Quality to inform planning related to the State's electricity
and water supply needs.
(b) Statistical Compilation – The Commission, in consultation with the Department of
Environmental Quality, shall compile statistical information on the aggregate amounts of energy
and water consumed by large-load customers. The Commission shall publish this statistical
compilation on its website each year, provided that the annual reports filed by the large-load
customers in accordance with subsection (a) of this section shall not be considered public records
within the meaning of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes but shall remain confidential."
SECTION 7.(b) G.S. 143-355(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(18) Cooperate with the Utilities Commission in evaluating the water usage of
large-load customers, as defined in G.S. 62-3, and any resulting impacts to the
availability of water supply. In carrying out this evaluation, the Department
shall coordinate with units of local government and any other agency or
organization concerned with the conservation and development of water
resources."

APPROPRIATION
SECTION 8. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Utilities
Commission the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year to be used for purposes consistent with this act.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 1026-First Edition Page 7